Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 2. Bond Anticipation Notes.

Sec. 29.47.080.
Bond anticipation borrowing.

A municipality may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of general obligation and revenue bonds if

the general obligation bonds to be sold have been authorized by ordinance and ratified by a majority vote at an election;

the revenue bonds to be sold have been authorized by ordinance.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.090.
Issuance of notes.

The governing body shall issue negotiable or nonnegotiable notes for the amounts borrowed with a maturity date not to exceed one year from the date of issue.
All notes and the interest on them are payable at fixed places on or before a fixed time from the proceeds of the sale of bonds in anticipation of which the original note or notes were issued, unless the bonds have not been sold by the maturity date of the notes.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.100.
Issuance of new notes.

If the sale of the bonds has not occurred before the maturity of the notes issued in anticipation of the sale, the governing body shall issue new notes in order to meet payment of the notes then maturing, or shall renew the outstanding bond anticipation notes.
New notes issued or renewals of outstanding bond anticipation notes bear a maturity date not to exceed one year from the date of issue. Notes, new notes, and renewals of notes may not be outstanding for a total elapsed time of more than three years.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.110.
Repayment of notes.

Every note is payable from the proceeds of the sale of bonds that the notes anticipated or from the proceeds of the sale of new bond anticipation notes.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.120.
Security.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter as to payment of notes, notes issued in anticipation of the sale of general obligation bonds and the interest on them are secured by the full faith and credit of the municipality. The municipality may levy ad valorem taxes for payment without limitation of rate or amount.

Notes issued in anticipation of the sale of revenue bonds and the interest on them are secured in the same manner as are the revenue bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.130.
Limitation.

The total amount of notes issued and outstanding may at no time exceed the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.140.
Use of proceeds.

The proceeds from the sale of notes shall be used only for the purposes for which the proceeds from the sale of bonds may be used, or to meet payment of outstanding bond anticipation notes.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)